Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1 Annexation
6-51-115. Receipt and distribution of tax revenues.
[Effective on July 1, 2021. See the version effective until July 1, 2021.]

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, except that § 67-6-716 shall control the effective date of local jurisdictional boundary changes for sales and use tax purposes, whenever a municipality extends its boundaries by annexation, the county or counties in which the municipality is located shall continue to receive the revenue from all state and local taxes distributed on the basis of situs of collection, generated within the annexed area, until July 1 following the annexation, unless the annexation takes effect on July 1.

If the annexation takes effect on July 1, then the municipality shall begin receiving revenue from such taxes generated within the annexed area for the period beginning July 1.

Whenever a municipality extends its boundaries by annexation, the municipality shall notify the department of revenue of such annexation upon the annexation becoming effective, for the purpose of tax administration.

Such taxes shall include the local sales tax authorized in § 67-6-702, the wholesale beer tax authorized in § 57-6-103, the income tax on dividends authorized in § 67-2-102, and all other such taxes distributed to counties and municipalities based on the situs of their collection.

In addition to subsection (a), when a municipality annexes territory in which there is retail or wholesale activity at the time the annexation takes effect or within three (3) months after the annexation date, the following shall apply:

Notwithstanding § 57-6-103 or any other law to the contrary, for wholesale activity involving the sale of beer, the county shall continue to receive annually an amount equal to the amount received by the county in the twelve (12) months immediately preceding the effective date of the annexation for beer establishments in the annexed area that produced wholesale beer tax revenues during that entire twelve (12) months. For establishments that produced wholesale beer tax revenues for at least one (1) month but less than the entire twelve-month period, the county shall continue to receive an amount annually determined by averaging the amount of wholesale beer tax revenue produced during each full month the establishment was in business during that time and multiplying this average by twelve (12). For establishments that did not produce revenue before the annexation date but produced revenue within three (3) months after the annexation date, and for establishments that produced revenue for less than a full month prior to annexation, the county shall continue to receive annually an amount determined by averaging the amount of wholesale beer tax revenue produced during the first three (3) months the establishment was in operation and multiplying this average by twelve (12). This subdivision (b)(1) is subject to the exceptions in subsection (c). A municipality shall only pay the county the amount required by this subdivision (b)(1), for a period of fifteen (15) years.

Notwithstanding § 67-6-712 or any other law to the contrary, for retail activity subject to the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act, compiled in title 67, chapter 6, part 7, the county shall continue to receive annually an amount equal to the amount of revenue the county received pursuant to § 67-6-712(a)(2)(A) in the twelve (12) months immediately preceding the effective date of the annexation for business establishments in the annexed area that produced 1963 Local Option Revenue Act revenue during that entire twelve (12) months. For business establishments that produced such revenues for more than a month but less than the full twelve-month period, the county shall continue to receive an amount annually determined by averaging the amount of local option revenue produced by the establishment and allocated to the county under § 67-6-712(a)(2)(A) during each full month the establishment was in business during that time and multiplying this average by twelve (12). For business establishments that did not produce revenue before the annexation date and produced revenue within three (3) months after the annexation date, and for establishments that produced revenue for less than a full month prior to annexation, the county shall continue to receive annually an amount determined by averaging the amount of the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act produced and allocated to the county under § 67-6-712(a)(2)(A) during the first three (3) months the establishment was in operation and multiplying this average by twelve (12). This subdivision (b)(2) is subject to the exceptions in subsection (c). A municipality shall only pay the county the amount required by this subdivision (b)(2), for a period of fifteen (15) years.

When the amount of local option sales tax produced by businesses in the annexed area cannot be determined from sales tax returns filed by the businesses, the commissioner may determine the amount to be distributed to the county over the fifteen-year period based on the best information available. For this purpose, the commissioner may use information obtained from business tax returns or obtain additional information from the businesses involved.

Subsection (b) is subject to these exceptions:

Subdivision (b)(1) ceases to apply as of the effective date of the repeal of the wholesale beer tax, should this occur;

Subdivision (b)(2) ceases to apply as of the effective date of the repeal of the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act, should this occur;

Should the general assembly reduce the amount of revenue from the Wholesale Beer Tax, compiled in title 57, chapter 6, part 1, or the 1963 Local Option Revenue Act, accruing to municipalities by changing the distribution formula, the amount of revenue accruing to the county under subsection (b) will be reduced proportionally as of the effective date of the reduction;

A county, by resolution of its legislative body, may waive its rights to receive all or part of the revenues provided by subsection (b). In these cases, the revenue shall be distributed as provided in §§ 57-6-103 and 67-6-712 of the respective tax laws unless otherwise provided by agreement between the county and municipality; and

Annual revenues paid to a county by or on behalf of the annexing municipality are limited to the annual revenue amounts provided in subsection (b) and known as “annexation date revenue” as defined in subdivision (d)(2). Annual situs-based revenues in excess of the “annexation date revenue” allocated to one (1) or more counties shall accrue to the annexing municipality. Any decrease in the revenues from the situs-based taxes identified in subsection (b) shall not affect the amount remitted to the county or counties pursuant to subsection (b), except as otherwise provided in this subsection (c); provided, that a municipality may petition the department of revenue no more often than annually to adjust annexation date revenue as a result of the closure or relocation of a tax producing entity.

It is the responsibility of the county within which the annexed territory lies to certify and to provide to the department a list of all tax revenue producing entities within the proposed annexation area.

The department shall determine the local share of revenue from each tax listed in this section generated within the annexed territory for the year before the annexation becomes effective, subject to the requirements of subsection (b). This revenue shall be known as the “annexation date revenue.”

The department, with respect to the revenues described in subdivision (b)(2), and the municipality, with respect to the revenues described in subdivision (b)(1), shall annually distribute an amount equal to the annexation date revenue to the county of the annexed territory.

Acts 1988, ch. 1016, § 1; 1998, ch. 1101, § 24; 2004, ch. 959, §§ 52, 53; 2005, ch. 311, § 2; 2007, ch. 602, §§ 127, 128; 2009, ch. 530, § 35; 2011, ch. 72, § 1; 2012, ch. 837, § 1; 2013, ch. 480, § 1; 2015, ch. 273, § 3; 2017, ch. 193, § 1; Acts 2019, ch. 157, § 1.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment, as amended by Acts 2009, ch. 530, § 35, and further amended by Acts 2011, ch. 72, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2013, ch. 480, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 273, § 3, and further amended by Acts 2017, ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, and further amended by Acts 2019, ch. 157, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “except that § 67-6-716 shall control the effective date of local jurisdictional boundary changes for sales and use tax purposes,” in the first sentence of subsection (a); and added (b)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, ch. 602, § 187. July 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 530, § 133. June 25, 2009, July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 72, § 18. April 13, 2011; July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 480, § 3. May 20, 2013; July 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 273, § 7. April 28, 2015; July 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 193, § 2. April 19, 2017; July 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 157, § 2. April 12, 2019; July 1, 2021.

Cross-References. Alcoholic beverage gross receipts taxes, distribution, § 57-4-306.

Income tax, distribution of revenue, § 67-2-119.

1963 Local Option Revenue Act, distribution of revenue, § 67-6-702.

Wholesale beer tax, levy and distribution, § 57-6-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Effective date of annexation for purposes of local sales tax distribution under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, OAG 04-037, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (3/12/04).

6-51-116. [Repealed.]

Acts 1993, ch. 36, § 1; repealed by Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 8, effective June 29, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 6-51-116 concerned annexation of territory in a county in a different time zone.

Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

6-51-117. Annexation of regional airport commission property.

If three (3) or more municipalities and counties jointly create and participate in a regional airport commission and if the property of the regional airport commission is located outside the boundaries of the participating municipalities, then no municipality shall annex any property of the regional airport commission without the prior consent of the legislative bodies of the participating municipalities and counties.

Acts 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

6-51-118. Applicability to certain counties with a metropolitan form of government.

No provision of Acts 1998, ch. 1101, applies to an annexation in any county with a metropolitan form of government in which any part of the general services district is annexed into the urban services district; provided, that any section of this part specifically referenced on May 19, 1998, in the charter of any county with a metropolitan form of government shall refer to the language of such sections in effect on January 1, 1998.

Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 1101, referred to in this section, enacted this section and chapter 58 of this title, amended numerous sections throughout this title and title 7, and made minor changes in title 13. See the Session Laws Disposition table in Volume 13.

6-51-119. Provision of copy of resolution for annexation, the plan for emergency services and map designating the annexed area to emergency communications district.

The legislative body of an annexing municipality or its designee shall provide a copy of the resolution for annexation, along with a copy of the portion of the plan of services dealing with emergency services and a detailed map designating the annexed area, to any affected emergency communications district upon ratification of a resolution to annex. The map shall identify all public and private streets in the area to be annexed, including street names and direction indicators. The map shall include or have appended a list of address ranges for each street to be annexed. For contested resolutions for annexation, in cases in which the municipality plans to begin providing emergency services in the annexed territory immediately, the municipality shall notify the district when the annexation becomes final. Compliance or noncompliance with this section is not admissible against the municipality in any case brought under this title or title 29, chapter 14, or against the municipality or any affected emergency communications district under the Tennessee Governmental Tort Liability Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 20.

The municipality shall provide the information required in subsection (a) to an affected district by certified return receipt mail or other method that assures receipt by the district.

Acts 2005, ch. 264, § 3; 2005, ch. 411, § 3; 2015, ch. 512, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 264, § 3 purported to enact this section, effective July 1, 2005. Acts 2005, ch. 411, § 3 enacted similar provisions, effective June 17, 2005, but with the addition of subsection (b). Because of the enactment by ch. 411, the provisions of ch. 264 were not given effect.

Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment in (a), substituted “resolution for annexation” for “annexation ordinance” at the beginning of the first sentence; substituted “upon ratification of a resolution to annex” for “upon final passage of the ordinance” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “resolutions for annexation” for “annexation ordinances” in the fourth sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

6-51-120. Annexation of territory in a state park or natural area.

No municipality shall annex any territory located within any state park or natural area unless all of the following conditions are met:

The territory proposed for annexation must be located within the municipality's urban growth boundaries;

The municipality must provide advance written notification of the proposed annexation to the commissioner of environment and conservation;

The advance written notification must include a detailed description of the territory proposed for annexation, reasons for the proposed annexation, the proposed plan of municipal services, and the timeline for actual delivery of each municipal service;

The department of environment and conservation must study the likely impact upon the park or natural area and its wildlife, scenery, ambiance, traffic, roads, visitors and mission. The cost of the study shall be borne by the municipality proposing the annexation;

As a component of the study, the department must conduct one (1) or more public hearings for citizen input;

Prior to the public hearing, the department must seek the county commission's input regarding the municipality's proposed annexation; and

The department must report its findings and may prescribe such binding prerequisites for the proposed annexation as may be necessary and desirable to protect and preserve the park or natural area for the benefit of all current and future Tennesseans.

Acts 2008, ch. 1033, § 1.

6-51-121. Recording of annexation resolution by annexing municipality.

Upon referendum approval of an annexation resolution as provided in this part, an annexing municipality shall record the resolution with the register of deeds in the county or counties where the annexation was adopted or approved. The resolution must include a detailed description of the annexed territory, including, but not limited to, map and parcel numbers of all real property within the annexed territory. A copy of the resolution, map, and detailed description must be sent to the comptroller of the treasury and the assessor of property for each county affected by the annexation.

Acts 2011, ch. 111, § 1; 2015, ch. 512, § 9; 2019, ch. 120, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18 provided that the act take effect at 12:01 a.m. on May 16, 2015. However, the governor signed the act and it became law on May 20, 2015. Pursuant to Article II, § 20, of the Constitution of Tennessee, the act takes effect 40 days after the bill became law. Thus, the effective date of the act is June 29, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Upon” for “Upon adoption of an annexation ordinance or upon” at the beginning of the section and deleted “ordinance or” preceding “resolution” three times in the section.

The 2019 amendment rewrote the second sentence which read: “The resolution shall describe the territory that was annexed by the municipality.”; and substituted “A copy of the resolution, map, and detailed description must be sent” for “A copy of the resolution shall also be sent” at beginning of the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 512, § 18. June 29, 2015 [See the Compiler's Notes.].

Acts 2019, ch. 120, § 3. April 9, 2019.

6-51-122. No municipality permitted to extend corporate limits by annexation ordinance on municipality's own initiative for certain period of time — Exceptions — Comprehensive review and evaluation of state policies.

Notwithstanding this part or any other law to the contrary:

From April 15, 2013, through April 15, 2014, no municipality shall extend its corporate limits by means of annexation by ordinance upon the municipality's own initiative, pursuant to § 6-51-102, in order to annex territory being used primarily for residential or agricultural purposes; and no such ordinance to annex such territory shall become operative during such period, except as otherwise permitted pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B);

If, prior to April 15, 2013, a municipality formally initiated an annexation ordinance restricted by subdivision (a)(1)(A); and if the municipality would suffer substantial and demonstrable financial injury if such ordinance does not become operative prior to April 15, 2014; then, upon petition by the municipality submitted prior to April 15, 2014, the county legislative body may, by a majority vote of its membership, waive the restrictions imposed on such ordinance by subdivision (a)(1)(A); and

From April 15, 2014, through May 15, 2015, no municipality shall extend its corporate limits by means of annexation by ordinance, pursuant to § 6-51-102, or by resolution, pursuant to §§ 6-51-104 and 6-51-105; and no annexation shall become operative during such period, unless otherwise permitted pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B), (a)(2)(B), or § 6-58-118, or unless the owner or owners of the property give written consent for the annexation;

If, prior to April 15, 2014, a municipality formally acted upon an annexation ordinance or resolution restricted by subdivision (a)(2)(A); and if the municipality would suffer substantial and demonstrable financial injury if such ordinance or resolution does not become operative prior to May 15, 2015; then, upon petition by the municipality submitted prior to May 15, 2015, the county legislative body may, by a majority vote of its membership, waive the restrictions imposed on such ordinance or resolution by subdivision (a)(2)(A).

On or before February 15, 2015, the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR) shall complete a comprehensive review and evaluation of the efficacy of state policies set forth within this chapter and chapter 58 of this title, and shall submit a written report of findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives.

Acts 2013, ch. 441, § 1; 2014, ch. 707, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Acts 2013, ch. 441 does not preclude the implementation of annexation ordinances that were the subject of litigation contesting the validity of the ordinances, when the litigation was resolved prior to the date on which Chapter 441 became effective. OAG 13-71, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 71 (9/4/13).

Moratorium’s effect upon city annexation of property. OAG 14-07, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/10/14).

State could lawfully and constitutionally withhold from a municipality state-shared revenue for an area that was lawfully annexed by the municipality between the operative dates set forth in proposed SB 121 [not enacted], April 15, 2013, and May 15, 2015. The General Assembly has the authority to change the portion of state-shared revenue that it allocates to a municipality both retroactively and prospectively. OAG 15-30, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30 (4/2/15).

6-51-123. County having metropolitan government permitted to expand area of urban services district by any method authorized by charter.

Notwithstanding Chapter 707 of the Public Acts of 2014, this part, or any other law to the contrary, any county having a metropolitan form of government may expand the area of its urban services district using any method authorized by its charter. Such expansion may also be accomplished using any method, identified by charter reference to general annexation law, that was applicable at the time the charter or amendment was approved by referendum held pursuant to Article XI, § 9 of the Tennessee Constitution and § 7-2-106(c) or § 7-2-108(a)(20).

Acts 2014, ch. 707, § 5.